en: Outsole marking type: Marking; Non-marking; Scuff resistant; Other
ru: Тип следов подошвы: Оставляющая следы; Не оставляющая следов; Устойчивая к царапинам; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta oznake potplata: Ostavlja tragove; Ne ostavlja tragove; Otporno na habanje; Ostalo
lt-LT: Pado žymėjimo tipas: Žymintis; Nežymintis; Atsparus įbrėžimams; Kita
it: Tipo di marcatura della suola: Marking; Non-marking; Resistente ai graffi; Altro
fi: Ulkopohjan merkinnän tyyppi: Jälkiä jättävä; Jälkiä jättämätön; Naarmuuntumaton; Muu
de: Art der Sohlenmarkierung: Abfärbend; Nicht abfärbend; Abriebfest; Sonstige
el: Τύπος σήμανσης εξωτερικής σόλας: Αφήνει σημάδια; Δεν αφήνει σημάδια; Ανθεκτικό στις γρατσουνιές; Άλλο
pl: Rodzaj oznaczenia podeszwy zewnętrznej: Brudzące; Niebrudzące; Odporne na ścieranie; Inne
zh-TW: 外底留痕類型: 留痕; 不留痕; 耐磨; 其他
zh-CN: 外底标记类型: 留痕; 无痕; 耐磨损; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta puščanja sledi zunanjega podplata: Pušča sledi; Ne pušča sledi; Odporno proti odrgninam; Drugo
sv: Märkningstyp för yttersula: Lämnar märken; Non-marking; Nötningsbeständig; Övrigt
nb: Type merking på yttersåle: Avsetter merker; Avsetter ikke merker; Slitasjebestandig; Annet
ko: 밑창 표시 유형: 마킹; 논마킹; 내마모성; 기타
ja: アウトソールマーキングタイプ: マーキング; ノンマーキング; 耐スカフ; その他
bg-BG: Вид маркировка на външната подметка: Оставяща следи; Неоставяща следи; Устойчива на надраскване; Друго
es: Tipo de marcado de la suela: Que deja marcas; Que no deja marcas; Resistente a los rayones; Otro
sk-SK: Typ stôp z podrážky: Farbiaca; Nefarbiaca; Odolná voči odreniu; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de marcação da sola: Que deixa marca; Que não deixa marca; Resistente a arranhões; Outro
pt-BR: Solado marcação tipo: Deixa marcas; Não deixa marcas; Resistente a arranhões; Outros
hu: Külső talp nyomhagyásának típusa: Nyomot hagyó; Nem hagy nyomot; Kopásálló; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการทำเครื่องหมายบนพื้นรองเท้า: ทิ้งรอย; ไม่ทิ้งรอย; ทนทานต่อรอยขีดข่วน; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại ký hiệu trên đế ngoài: Tạo vết; Không tạo vết; Chống xước; Khác
cs: Typ značení podrážky: Zanechávající stopy; Nezanechávající stopy; Odolné proti oděru; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tip de marcaj al tălpii exterioare: Care lasă urme; Care nu lasă urme; Rezistent la zgârieturi; Altele
tr: Dış taban iz bırakma tipi: İz bırakan; İz bırakmayan; Aşınmaya dayanıklı; Diğer
nl: Buitenzool markeringstype: Markerend; Non-marking; Krasbestendig; Overige
fr: Type de traces laissées par la semelle extérieure: Marquante; Non marquante; Résistante aux éraflures; Autre
da: Type af mærkning på ydersål: Afsmittende; Non-marking; Slidstærk; Andet